District of Columbia statutes.
15-388

Repealed

Uniformity of application and construction.

Repealed.

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-84, § 2, 42 DCR 6787
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 100, 51 DCR 881
Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(c), 58 DCR 11186
1981 Ed., § 15-388.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act.